Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-909
Existing contracts, agreements, rules, regulations, plan, and waivers; how treated; department; powers and duties.

(1) All contracts, agreements, rules, and regulations relating to the medical assistance program as entered into or adopted and promulgated by the department prior to July 1, 2006, and all provisions of the medicaid state plan and waivers adopted by the department prior to July 1, 2006, shall remain in effect until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law.

(2) The department shall monitor the implementation of rules and regulations, medicaid state plan amendments, and waivers adopted under the Medical Assistance Act and the effect of such rules and regulations, amendments, or waivers on eligible recipients of medical assistance and medical assistance expenditures.

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 15;

Laws 2011, LB468, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 92;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 8;

Laws 2017, LB644, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 11.